zh-CN: 保健/美容/卫生/护理 > 珠宝首饰清洗与护理 > 首饰收纳/展具: 耳环架; 珠宝盒; 首饰卷; 珠宝架; 珠宝托盘; 戒指座; 壁挂式珠宝收纳盒
tr: Sağlık ve Güzellik > Mücevher Temizlik ve Bakımı > Mücevher Düzenleyiciler: Küpe Tutucuları; Mücevher Kutuları; Mücevher Ruloları; Mücevher Standları; Mücevher Tepsileri; Yüzük Tutucular; Duvara Monte Mücevher Organizatörleri
nb: Skjønnhet og helse > Rengjøring og pleie av smykker > Smykkeholdere: Øredobbholdere; Smykkeesker; Smykkeruller; Smykkestativ; Smykkebrett; Ringholdere; Veggmonterte smykkeholdere
lt-LT: Sveikata ir grožis > Juvelyrinių dirbinių valymas ir priežiūra > Juvelyrinių dirbinių laikikliai: Auskarų laikikliai; Juvelyrinių dirbinių dėžutės; Papuošalų ritinėliai; Juvelyrinių dirbinių stovai; Juvelyrinių dirbinių padėklai; Žiedų laikikliai; Sieniniai juvelyrinių dirbinių laikikliai
da: Sundhed og skønhed > Smykkerens og pleje > Smykkeholdere: Øreringsophæng; Smykkeæsker; Smykkeruller; Smykkestativer; Smykkebakker; Ringholdere; Vægmonterede smykkeholdere
pt-BR: Saúde e beleza > Limpeza e cuidado de jóias > Porta-jóias: Suportes para brincos; Caixa de joias; Rolos para joias; Suportes para joias; Bandejas para joias; Porta-anéis; Organizadores de joias montados na parede
sl-SI: Zdravje in lepota > Čiščenje in nega nakita > Držala za nakit: Držala za uhane; Škatle za nakit; Zvitki za nakit; Stojala za nakit; Podstavki za nakit; Držala za prstane; Stenski organizatorji nakita
sv: Skönhet och hälsa > Smyckesvård och smyckesrengöring > Smyckesställ: Örhängeshållare; Smyckeskrin; Smyckesrullar; Smyckeställ; Smyckesbrickor; Ringhållare; Väggmonterade smyckesorganisatörer
hr-HR: Zdravlje i ljepota > Čišćenje i njega nakita > Držači za nakit: Držači za naušnice; Kutije za nakit; Putne torbice za nakit; Stalci za nakit; Posude za nakit; Držači za prstenje; Zidni organizatori nakita
zh-TW: 保健與美容 > 首飾清潔保養 > 飾品架: 耳環架; 珠寶盒; 珠寶卷; 珠寶架; 珠寶盤; 戒指架; 壁掛式珠寶收納盒
nl: Gezondheid en persoonlijke verzorging > Reiniging en onderhoud van sieraden > Sieradenhouders: Oorbel houders; Sieradendozen; Sieraden rollen; Sieradenstandaarden; Sieradenschalen; Ringhouders; Wandgemonteerde sieradenorganizers
de: Gesundheit & Schönheit > Schmuckreinigung & -pflege > Schmuckständer & -kästen: Ohrringhalter; Schmuckschatullen; Schmuckrollen; Schmuckständer; Schmucktabletts; Ringhalter; Wandmontierte Schmuck-Organizer
el: Υγεία & ομορφιά > Καθαρισμός & περιποίηση κοσμημάτων > Κάτοχοι κοσμημάτων: Σταντ σκουλαρικιών; Κουτιά κοσμημάτων; Ρολά κοσμημάτων; Βάσεις κοσμημάτων; Δίσκοι κοσμημάτων; Κάτοχοι δαχτυλιδιών; Επιτοίχιοι οργανωτές κοσμημάτων
bg-BG: Здраве и красота > Почистване и грижа за бижута > Поставки за бижута: Стойки за обеци; Кутии за бижута; Ролки за бижута; Стойки за бижута; Табли за бижута; Поставки за пръстени; Стенни органайзери за бижута
en: Health & Beauty > Jewelry Cleaning & Care > Jewelry Holders: Earring Holders; Jewelry Boxes; Jewelry Rolls; Jewelry Stands; Jewelry Trays; Ring Holders; Wall-Mounted Jewelry Organizers
vi: Sức khỏe và sắc đẹp > Vệ sinh và bảo quản trang sức > Giá treo và hộp đựng trang sức: Giá đỡ hoa tai; Hộp đựng trang sức; Túi cuộn đựng trang sức; Giá treo trang sức; Khay đựng trang sức; Giá đỡ nhẫn; Ngăn đựng trang sức gắn tường
pl: Zdrowie i uroda > Czyszczenie i pielęgnacja biżuterii > Przechowywanie biżuterii: Stojaki na kolczyki; Pudełka na biżuterię; Rolki na biżuterię; Stojaki na biżuterię; Tacki na biżuterię; Uchwyty do pierścionków; Naścienne organizery na biżuterię
it: Salute e bellezza > Pulizia e cura dei gioielli > Portagioie: Espositore per orecchini; Scatole per gioielli; Rotoli per gioielli; Supporti per gioielli; Vassoi per gioielli; Porta anelli; Organizzatori di gioielli a parete
ko: 건강/미용 > 주얼리 세척/관리 > 주얼리 보관 용품: 귀걸이 홀더; 주얼리 상자; 주얼리 롤; 주얼리 스탠드; 주얼리용 트레이; 반지 홀더; 벽설치형 주얼리 정리함
es: Salud y belleza > Limpieza y cuidado de joyas > Soportes para joyería: Organizadores de aretes; Cajas de joyería; Rollos de joyería; Puestos de joyería; Bandejas de joyería; Porta anillos; Organizadores de joyas de pared
ro-RO: Sănătate și frumusețe > Curățarea și îngrijirea bijuteriilor > Suporturi pentru bijuterii: Suporturi pentru cercei; Cutii pentru bijuterii; Role pentru bijuterii; Standuri pentru bijuterii; Tăvi pentru bijuterii; Suporturi pentru inele; Organizatoare de bijuterii montate pe perete
ja: 美容・健康 > ジュエリーお手入れ用品 > ジュエリーボックス・ジュエリースタンド: イヤリングホルダー; ジュエリーボックス; ジュエリーロール; ジュエリースタンド; ジュエリートレイ; リングホルダー; 壁掛けジュエリーオーガナイザー
fi: Terveys ja kauneus > Korujen puhdistus ja huolto > Korutelineet: Korvakorukotelo; Korurasiat; Korurulla; Korutelineratkaisut; Korutarjottimet; Sormustelineet; Seinään asennettavat korujen säilytysratkaisut
fr: Santé et beauté > Entretien et nettoyage des bijoux > Présentoirs à bijoux: Supports à boucles d’oreilles; Boîtes à bijoux; Rouleaux à bijoux; Support pour bijoux; Plateaux à bijoux; Porte-bagues; Organisateurs de bijoux muraux
ru: Красота и здоровье > Уход за ювелирными изделиями > Хранение ювелирных изделий: Держатели для сережек; Шкатулки для ювелирных изделий; Свертки для украшений; Подставки для ювелирных изделий; Коробки-органайзеры для ювелирных изделий; Подставки для колец; Настенные органайзеры для ювелирных изделий
cs: Zdraví a krása > Čištění a péče o šperky > Skříňky a stojany na šperky: Stojany na náušnice; Šperkovnice; Svinovací pouzdra na šperky; Stojany na šperky; Přihrádky na šperky; Držáky prstenů; Nástěnné organizéry na šperky
hu: Egészség és szépség > Ékszertisztítás és -ápolás > Ékszertartók: Fülbevalótartók; Ékszerdobozok; Ékszertárolók; Ékszerállványok; Ékszertálcák; Gyűrűtartók; Falra szerelhető ékszerszervezők
pt-PT: Saúde e beleza > Limpeza e cuidado de joalharia > Suportes de joalharia: Suportes para brincos; Guarda-joias; Rolos para joias; Suportes para joias; Tabuleiros para joias; Suportes para anéis; Organizadores de joias montados na parede
th: สุขภาพและความงาม > การดูแลและทำความสะอาดเครื่องเพชรพลอย > ที่ใส่เครื่องประดับ: ที่แขวนต่างหู; กล่องใส่เครื่องประดับ; ผ้าม้วนใส่เครื่องประดับ; ที่วางเครื่องประดับ; ถาดใส่เครื่องประดับ; ที่วางแหวน; ที่จัดเก็บเครื่องประดับแบบติดผนัง
sk-SK: Zdravie a krása > Čistenie a starostlivosť o šperky > Držiaky na šperky: Držiaky na náušnice; Šperkovnice; Rolovacie puzdrá na šperky; Stojany na šperky; Misky na šperky; Držiaky na prstene; Nástenné organizéry šperkov